Georgia, session 2025_26, HB911.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 5 of Title 51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to libel and slander,
is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"51-5-13.
(a) An individual shall not bring an action pursuant to this chapter against another
individual who makes a communication without malice regarding an incident of sexual
assault, sexual harassment, or sex discrimination if, at the time of making the
communication, the communicating individual has a reasonable belief that sexual assault,
sexual harassment, or sex discrimination occurred.
H. B. 911
- 1 -

LC 62 0211
(b) A prevailing defendant in an action brought in violation of subsection (a) of this Code
section is entitled to recover reasonable attorney's fees, expenses of litigation, and costs."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 911
- 2 -